Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 11. Judicial Authorization of Treatment.

§ 37.2-1100.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Disorder”
includes any physical or mental disorder or impairment, whether caused by injury, disease, genetics, or other cause.

“Incapable of making an informed decision”
means unable to understand the nature, extent, or probable consequences of a proposed treatment or unable to make a rational evaluation of the risks and benefits of the proposed treatment as compared with the risks and benefits of alternatives to the treatment. Persons with dysphasia or other communication disorders who are mentally competent and able to communicate shall not be considered incapable of giving informed consent.

“Treatment”
includes the provision, withholding, or withdrawal of a specific treatment or course of treatment upon a showing that the requirements of subsection G of §

37.2-1101

have been met.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, cc. 716, 751.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, cc. 989 and 1018, cls. 3, 4 and 5, provide:

“3. That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage, notwithstanding the provisions of Items 49 C and 331 C1 of Chapter 899 of the Acts of Assembly of 2002.

“4. That, notwithstanding the provisions of Items 49 C and 331 C1 of Chapter 899 of the Acts of Assembly of 2002, the provisions of Chapters 946 and 985, as they may be amended, of the Acts of Assembly of 1999 shall become effective on the effective date of this act [April 2, 2003.]

“5. That the third enactments of Chapter 946 and Chapter 985, as amended, of the Acts of Assembly of 1999 are amended and reenacted as follows:

“3. That the effective date of this act is the date of enactment of House Bill 1400, House Bill 2445 or Senate Bill 1149 of the 2003 General Assembly Session, whichever is the first to be enacted.

“3. That the effective date of this act is the date of enactment of House Bill 1400, House Bill 2445 or Senate Bill 1149 of the 2003 General Assembly Session, whichever is the first to be enacted.”

House Bill 2445 (Chapter 989) and Senate Bill 1149 (Chapter 1018) of the 2003 General Assembly were enacted on April 2, 2003, the date they were approved by the Governor. See also Acts 2003, c. 1042, cls. 10 and 11.

Acts 2005, c. 751 amended § 37.1-134.21 B, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 751 has been given effect in this section by adding the definition of “Treatment.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-739 Petition for Treatment of Medical Emergency of Person Without a Guardian, et seq.

§ 37.2-1101.
Judicial authorization of treatment.

An appropriate circuit court or district court judge or special justice may authorize treatment for a mental or physical disorder on behalf of an adult person, in accordance with this section, if it finds upon clear and convincing evidence that (i) the person is either incapable of making an informed decision on his own behalf or is incapable of communicating such a decision due to a physical or mental disorder and (ii) the proposed treatment is in the best interest of the person.

Any person may request authorization of treatment for an adult person by filing a petition in the circuit court or district court or with a special justice of the county or city in which the person for whom treatment is sought resides or is located or in the county or city in which the proposed place of treatment is located. Upon filing the petition, the petitioner or the court shall deliver or send a certified copy of the petition to the person for whom treatment is sought and, if the identity and whereabouts of the person’s next of kin are known, to the next of kin.

As soon as reasonably possible after the filing of the petition, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the interests of the person for whom treatment is sought at the hearing. However, the appointment shall not be required in the event that the person or another interested person on behalf of the person elects to retain private counsel at his own expense to represent the interests of the person at the hearing. If the person for whom treatment is sought is indigent, his counsel shall be paid by the Commonwealth as provided in §

37.2-804

from funds appropriated to reimburse expenses incurred in the involuntary admission process. However, this provision shall not be construed to prohibit the direct payment of an attorney’s fee by the person or an interested person on his behalf, which fee shall be subject to the review and approval of the court.

Following the appointment of an attorney pursuant to subsection C, the court shall schedule an expedited hearing of the matter. The court shall notify the person for whom treatment is sought, his next of kin, if known, the petitioner, and their respective counsel of the date and time for the hearing. In scheduling the hearing, the court shall take into account the type and severity of the alleged physical or mental disorder, as well as the need to provide the person’s attorney with sufficient time to adequately prepare his client’s case.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections B and D regarding delivery or service of the petition and notice of the hearing to the next of kin of any person for whom consent to treatment is sought, if the person is a patient in any hospital, including a hospital licensed by the Department of Health pursuant to §

32.1-123

or an individual receiving services in any facility operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and such person has no known guardian or legally authorized representative, at the time the petition is filed, the court may dispense with the requirement of any notice to the next of kin. If treatment is necessary to prevent imminent or irreversible harm, the court in its discretion may dispense with the requirement of providing notice. This subsection shall not be construed to interfere with any decision made pursuant to the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.).

Prior to the hearing, the attorney shall investigate the risks and benefits of the treatment decision for which authorization is sought and of alternatives to the proposed decision. The attorney shall make a reasonable effort to inform the person of this information and to ascertain the person’s religious beliefs and basic values and the views and preferences of the person’s next of kin. A health care provider shall disclose or make available to the attorney, upon request, any information, records, and reports concerning the person that the attorney determines necessary to perform his duties under this section. Evidence presented at the hearing may be submitted by affidavit in the absence of objection by the person for whom treatment is sought, the petitioner, either of their respective counsel, or by any other interested party.

Prior to authorizing treatment pursuant to this section, the court shall find:

That there is no available person with legal authority under Article 8 (§

54.1-2981

et seq.) of Chapter 29 of Title 54.1, under the regulations promulgated pursuant to §

37.2-400

, or under other applicable law to authorize the proposed treatment. A person who would have legal authority to authorize the proposed treatment shall be deemed to be unavailable if such person (i) cannot be contacted within a reasonable period of time in light of the immediacy of the need for treatment for the person for whom treatment is sought, (ii) is incapable of making an informed decision, or (iii) is unable or unwilling to make a decision regarding authorization of the proposed treatment or to serve as the legally authorized representative of the person for whom treatment is sought;

That the person for whom treatment is sought is incapable of making an informed decision regarding treatment or is physically or mentally incapable of communicating such a decision;

That the person who is the subject of the petition is unlikely to become capable of making an informed decision or of communicating an informed decision within the time required for decision; and

That the proposed treatment is in the best interest of the person and is medically and ethically appropriate with respect to (i) the medical diagnosis and prognosis and (ii) any other information provided by the attending physician of the person for whom treatment is sought. However, the court shall not authorize a proposed treatment that is contrary to the provisions of an advance directive executed by the person pursuant to §

54.1-2983

or is proven by a preponderance of the evidence to be contrary to the person’s religious beliefs or basic values or to specific preferences stated by the person before becoming incapable of making an informed decision, unless the treatment is necessary to prevent death or a serious irreversible condition. The court shall take into consideration the right of the person to rely on nonmedical, remedial treatment in the practice of religion in lieu of medical treatment.

Any order authorizing treatment pursuant to subsection A shall describe any treatment authorized and may authorize generally such related examinations, tests, or services as the court may determine to be reasonably related to the treatment authorized. Treatment authorized by such order may include palliative care as defined in §

32.1-162.1

, if appropriate. The order shall require the treating physician to review and document the appropriateness of the continued administration of antipsychotic medications not less frequently than every 30 days. The order shall require the treating physician or other service provider to report to the court and the person’s attorney any change in the person’s condition resulting in probable restoration or development of the person’s capacity to make and to communicate an informed decision prior to completion of any authorized treatment and related services. The order may further require the treating physician or other service provider to report to the court and the person’s attorney any change in circumstances regarding any authorized treatment or related services that may indicate that such authorization is no longer in the person’s best interests. Upon receipt of such report or upon the petition of any interested party, the court may enter an order withdrawing or modifying its prior authorization as it deems appropriate. Any petition or order under this section may be orally presented or entered, provided a written order shall be subsequently executed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a treating physician or other service provider to administer treatment without judicial authorization when necessary to stabilize the condition of the person for whom treatment is sought in an emergency.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, cc. 716, 751; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 115, 378, 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 751 amended former § 37.1-134.21, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendments by c. 751 have been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2005 amendments by c. 751 deleted “the provision, withholding, or withdrawal of a specific treatment, or course of” preceding “treatment,” substituted “person for whom treatment is sought” for “allegedly incapable person” and “for whom treatment is sought” for “who is the subject of such petition” and related changes throughout the section; in subsection A, substituted “treatment” for “action” in clause (ii); in subsection F, substituted “for whom consent to treatment is sought” for “who is the subject of such petition,” inserted “or a resident in any facility operated by the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services and such person has no known guardian or legally authorized representative” in the first sentence and added the second sentence;
in subsection H deleted “or course of treatment” before “authorized” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in subsection E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 115 and 378 are identical, and rewrote subdivision G 1, which formerly read: “That there is no legally authorized representative available to give consent”; in subdivision G 4, in the next-to-last sentence, inserted “contrary to the provisions of an advance directive executed by the person pursuant to §

54.1-2983

or is” and “or to specific preferences stated by the person before becoming incapable of making an informed decision”; and added subsection I.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “an individual receiving services” for “a resident” in the first sentence of subsection E.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-740 Medical Treatment and Detention Petition.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 4.

§ 37.2-1102.
Certain actions may not be authorized.

The following actions may not be authorized under this chapter:

Nontherapeutic sterilization, abortion, or psychosurgery.

Admission to a training center or a hospital. However, the court may issue an order under §

37.2-1101

authorizing treatment of a person whose admission to a training center or hospital has been or is simultaneously being authorized under §

37.2-805

,

37.2-806

,

37.2-807

, or §§

37.2-809

through

37.2-813

, or of a person who is subject to an order of involuntary admission previously or simultaneously issued under §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

or of Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.).

Administration of antipsychotic medication for a period to exceed 180 days or electroconvulsive therapy for a period to exceed 60 days pursuant to any petition filed under this section. The court may authorize electroconvulsive therapy only if it is demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence, which shall include the testimony of a licensed psychiatrist, that all other reasonable forms of treatment have been considered and that electroconvulsive therapy is the most effective treatment for the person. Even if the court has authorized administration of antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsive therapy hereunder, these treatments may be administered over the person’s objection only if he is subject to an order of involuntary admission, including involuntary outpatient treatment, previously or simultaneously issued under §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

or Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.), or the provisions of Chapter 11 (§

19.2-167

et seq.) or Chapter 11.1 (§

19.2-182.2

et seq.) of Title 19.2.

Restraint or transportation of the person, unless the court finds upon clear and convincing evidence that restraint or transportation is necessary to the administration of an authorized treatment for a physical disorder or for a mental disorder if the person is subject to an order of involuntary admission issued previously or simultaneously under Chapter 11 (§

19.2-167

et seq.) or 11.1 (§

19.2-182.2

et seq.) of Title 19.2, §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

, or Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.).

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, cc. 716, 751; 2012, cc. 115, 378.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 751 amended former § 37.1-134.21 I, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendments have been given effect in this section as set out above by deleting “the provision, withholding, or withdrawal of a specific treatment or course of” before “treatment” in subdivision 1; and substituting “administration” for “provision” in subdivision 4.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 115 and 378 are identical, and deleted “of this title” following “(§

37.2-900

et seq.)” in subdivisions 2 and 3; and in subdivision 4, substituted “the court” for “it” and added the language beginning “or for a mental disorder” at the end.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 4.

§ 37.2-1103.
Emergency custody orders for adult persons who are incapable of making an informed decision as a result of physical injury or illness.

Based upon the opinion of a licensed physician that an adult person is incapable of making an informed decision as a result of a physical injury or illness and that the medical standard of care indicates that testing, observation, and treatment are necessary to prevent imminent and irreversible harm, a magistrate may issue, for good cause shown, an emergency custody order for the adult person to be taken into custody and transported to a hospital emergency room for testing, observation, or treatment.

Prior to issuance of an emergency custody order pursuant to this section, the magistrate shall ascertain that there is no legally authorized person available to give consent to necessary treatment for the adult person and that the adult person (i) is incapable of making an informed decision regarding obtaining necessary treatment, (ii) has refused transport to obtain such necessary treatment, (iii) has indicated an intention to resist such transport, and (iv) is unlikely to become capable of making an informed decision regarding obtaining necessary treatment within the time required for such decision.

An opinion by the licensed physician that an adult person is incapable of making an informed decision as a result of physical injury or illness shall only be rendered after the licensed physician has communicated electronically or personally with the emergency medical services personnel on the scene and has attempted to communicate electronically or personally with the adult person to obtain information and medical data concerning the cause of the adult person’s incapacity, has attempted to obtain consent from the adult person, and has failed to obtain consent.

If there is a change in the person’s condition, the emergency medical services personnel shall contact the licensed physician. If at any time the licensed physician determines that a person subject to an order under this subsection has become capable of making and communicating an informed decision, the physician shall rely on the person’s decision on whether to consent to further observation, testing, or treatment.

Upon reaching the emergency room, the person shall be evaluated by a licensed physician. If the physician determines that the person meets the requirements of §

37.2-1104

, the physician may apply for a temporary detention order pursuant to that that section. If the physician determines that the person does not meet the requirements of §

37.2-1104

, the person shall be released from custody immediately. The person shall remain in custody until this evaluation is performed, but in no event shall the period of custody under this section exceed four hours.

The law-enforcement officer may lawfully go to or be sent beyond the territorial limits of the county, city or town in which he serves to any point in the Commonwealth for the purpose of executing an emergency custody order pursuant to this section. Nothing herein shall preclude a law-enforcement officer from obtaining emergency medical treatment or further medical evaluation at any time for a person in his custody as provided in this section.

If an emergency custody order is not executed within four hours of its issuance, the order shall be void and shall be returned unexecuted to the office of the clerk of the issuing court or, if such office is not open, to any magistrate serving the jurisdiction of the issuing court.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 551, 691.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 551 and 691 are identical, and substituted “magistrate serving the jurisdiction of the issuing court” for “magistrate thereof” in subsection G.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-1901 Medical Treatment and Detention Petition, et seq.

§ 37.2-1104.
Temporary detention in hospital for testing, observation, or treatment.

As used in this section, “mental or physical condition” includes intoxication.

The court or, if the court is unavailable, a magistrate serving the jurisdiction where the respondent is located may, with the advice of a licensed physician who has attempted to obtain informed consent of an adult person to treatment of a mental or physical condition, issue an order authorizing temporary detention of the adult person in a hospital emergency department or other appropriate facility for testing, observation, or treatment upon a finding that (i) probable cause exists to believe the person is incapable of making or communicating an informed decision regarding treatment of a physical or mental condition due to a mental or physical condition and (ii) the medical standard of care calls for observation, testing, or treatment within the next 24 hours to prevent injury, disability, death, or other harm to the person resulting from such mental or physical condition.

The duration of temporary detention pursuant to this section shall not exceed 24 hours, unless extended by the court as part of an order authorizing treatment under §

37.2-1101

. If, before completion of authorized testing, observation, or treatment, the physician determines that a person subject to an order under this subsection has become capable of making and communicating an informed decision, the physician shall rely on the person’s decision on whether to consent to further testing, observation, or treatment. If, before issuance of an order under this subsection or during its period of effectiveness, the physician learns of an objection by a member of the person’s immediate family to the testing, observation, or treatment, he shall so notify the court or magistrate, who shall consider the objection in determining whether to issue, modify, or terminate the order.

A court or, if the court is unavailable, a magistrate serving the jurisdiction may issue an order authorizing temporary detention for testing, observation, or treatment for a person who is also the subject of an emergency custody order issued pursuant to §

37.2-808

, if such person meets the criteria set forth in subsection B. In any case in which an order for temporary detention for testing, observation, or treatment is issued for a person who is also the subject of an emergency custody order pursuant to §

37.2-808

, the hospital emergency room or other appropriate facility in which the person is detained for testing, observation, or treatment shall notify the nearest community services board when such testing, observation, or treatment is complete, and the designee of the community services board shall, as soon as is practicable and prior to the expiration of the order for temporary detention issued pursuant to subsection B, conduct an evaluation of the person to determine if he meets the criteria for temporary detention pursuant to §

37.2-809

.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 551, 691; 2015, c. 659; 2020, cc. 1233, 1267.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1233 and 1267, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall convene a work group to include representatives from the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Virginia Sheriff’s Association, and the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia to develop standard policies and procedures regarding medical temporary detention orders. The work group shall complete its work no later than December 1, 2020.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 551 and 691 are identical, and deleted “or a magistrate’s” following “within the court’s” and inserted “serving the jurisdiction” preceding “may issue an order” in the first sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 659 added the subsection A designation; in subsection A, substituted “mental condition” for “mental disorder” twice, deleted “of the disorder” following “testing, observation, or treatment” and substituted “to treat an emergency medical condition that requires immediate action to avoid harm, injury, or death” for “a serious irreversible condition” in the first sentence; and added subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1233 and 1267 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted the existing provisions and added “As used in this section, ‘mental or physical condition’ includes intoxication” at the end of subsection A; inserted subsection B designator, inserted “The” preceding “court,” inserted “where the respondent is located” preceding “may,” inserted “with the advice of a licensed physician who has attempted to obtain informed consent of an adult person to treatment of a mental or physical condition” preceding “issue,” inserted “adult” preceding “person,” substituted “in” for “by,” substituted “department” for “room,” substituted “for” for “and authorizing such,” inserted “upon finding that” preceding “or treatment,” and added clauses (i) and (ii) to subsection B; added subsection C designator; inserted “duration of temporary” preceding “detention,” substituted “pursuant to this section shall” for “may,” and substituted “exceed” for “be for a period exceeding”; substituted subsection D designator for existing subsection B designator and substituted “subsection B” for “subsection A” in subsection D.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-733.1 Medical Treatment and Detention Petition; No. 9-1901 Medical Treatment and Detention Petition.

§ 37.2-1105.
Appeal from order.

Any order of a judge or special justice under §

37.2-1101

, or of a judge, special justice or magistrate under §

37.2-1104

, may be appealed de novo within 10 days to the circuit court for the jurisdiction where the order was entered, and any order of a circuit court hereunder, either originally or on appeal, may be appealed within 10 days to the Court of Appeals.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-1106.
When health professional or licensed hospital not liable.

Any licensed health professional or licensed hospital, including a hospital licensed by the Department of Health pursuant to §

32.1-123

, administering treatment, or providing testing, or detention pursuant to the court’s or magistrate’s authorization as provided in this chapter shall have no liability arising out of a claim to the extent the claim is based on lack of consent to the treatment, testing or detention. Any such professional or hospital administering treatment with the consent of the person receiving or being offered treatment shall have no liability arising out of a claim to the extent it is based on lack of capacity to consent, if a court or a magistrate has denied a petition hereunder to authorize the treatment and the denial was based on an affirmative finding that the person was capable of making and communicating an informed decision regarding the proposed treatment.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, cc. 716, 751.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 751 amended former § 37.1-134.21 L, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendments by c. 751 have been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2005 amendments by c. 751, in the first sentence, substituted “administering treatment, or providing” for “providing, withholding, or wihdrawing treatment” and “treatment, testing or detention” for “course of treatment, testing or detention or the withholding or withdrawing of such treatment, testing or detention”; and in the second sentence substituted “administering” for “providing, withholding or withdrawing,” and deleted “provision, withholding or withdrawal of” before “treatment” at the end.

§ 37.2-1107.
Fees and expenses.

The provisions of §

37.2-804

relating to payment by the Commonwealth shall not apply to the cost of detention, testing, or treatment under this chapter.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-1108.
Effect of chapter on other laws.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to affect the right to use and the authority conferred by any other applicable statutory or regulatory procedure relating to consent or to diminish any common law authority of a physician or other treatment provider to administer treatment to a person unable to give or to communicate informed consent to those actions, with or without the consent of the person’s relative, including common law or other authority to provide treatment in an emergency situation; nor shall anything in this chapter be construed to affect the law defining the conditions under which consent shall be obtained for administering treatment or the nature of the consent required.

Judicial authorization for treatment pursuant to this chapter need not be obtained for a person for whom consent or authorization has been granted or issued or may be obtained in accordance with the provisions of Article 8 (§

54.1-2981

et seq.) of Chapter 29 of Title 54.1 or other applicable statutes or common law of the Commonwealth.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-134.21; 1999, cc. 814, 946, 985; 2003, c. 790; 2004, cc. 66, 104, 1014; 2005, cc. 716, 751.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 751 amended subsections P and Q of former § 37.1-134.21, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendments by c. 751 have been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2005 amendments by c. 751, in subsection A, substituted “administer treatment” for “provide, withhold or withdraw services” and “administering treatment” for “medical treatment”; and in subsection B, substituted “for treatment pursuant to this section” for “pursuant to this section for providing, withholding or withdrawing of treatment.”

§ 37.2-1109.
Use of electronic communication.

Petitions and orders for emergency custody and temporary detention pursuant to §

37.2-1103

or

37.2-1104

may be filed, issued, served, or executed by electronic means, with or without the use of two-way electronic video and audio communication, and returned in the same manner with the same force, effect, and authority as an original document. All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures.

Any judge or special justice may conduct proceedings pursuant to this chapter using any two-way electronic video and audio communication system to provide for the appearance of any parties and witnesses. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system used to conduct a proceeding shall meet the standards set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

. When a witness whose testimony would be helpful to the conduct of the proceeding is not able to be physically present, his testimony may be received using a telephonic communication system.

History.

2005, cc. 51, 716.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 51 enacted former § 37.1-67.7, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, and § 30-152, Acts 2005, c. 51 has been given effect in this section as set out above. See also §§

37.2-804.1

and

37.2-913

.